District of Columbia statutes.
29-405.26

Different quorum or voting requirements.

(a)

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may provide for a higher or lower quorum or voting requirement for members, or voting groups of members, than is provided for by this chapter.

(b)

An amendment to the articles of incorporation or bylaws that adds, changes, or deletes a greater quorum or voting requirement shall meet the same quorum requirement and be adopted by the same vote and voting groups required to take action under the quorum and voting requirements then in effect.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-405.24.